District of Columbia statutes.
25-1006

Repealed

Prohibition on use of watercraft under certain conditions — Preliminary testing; admissibility of test results.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-248, § 4, 44 DCR 1242
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 302, 59 DCR 12957
1981 Ed., § 25-1006.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 25-1004.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 25-1004.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 302 of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 13325).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For present law, see § 50-1908 et seq.